Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.340

Apprenticeship and training council outreach effort.

The Washington state apprenticeship and training council shall lead and coordinate an outreach effort to educate returning veterans about apprenticeship and career opportunities in the construction industry. The outreach effort shall include information about the "helmets to hardhats" program and other paths for making the transition from military service to the construction workforce. The outreach effort shall be developed and coordinated with apprenticeship programs, other state agencies involved in workforce training, and representatives of contractors and labor.

[ 2006 c 321 s 3.]